tmp/tmp5.aff
SET UTF-8

FLAG num

SFX 2 Y 12
SFX 2 0 ය .
SFX 2 0 ේ .
SFX 2 0 යක් .
SFX 2 0 යෙන් .
SFX 2 0 යන් .
SFX 2 0 ෙ .
SFX 2 0 යන්ට .
SFX 2 0 ැයි .
SFX 2 0 ා .
SFX 2 0 ු .
SFX 2 0 ේය [.
SFX 2 0 ෙමු .
SFX 3 Y 4
SFX 3 ණ ම් ණ
SFX 3 ණ නු ණ
SFX 3 ණ නා ණ
SFX 3 ණ නා ණ
